Alabama, session 2026rs, HB369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 6 of Act 2003-213, 2003 Regular
Session (Acts 2003, p. 541), as last amended by Act 2025-245,
2025 Regular Session, now appearing as Section 45-56-243.05,
Code of Alabama 1975, is amended to read as follows:
"§45-56-243.05
(a) The proceeds from the tax authorized, less two
percent of the actual amount of collection which shall be
retained by the state Department of Revenue, shall be
distributed to the Randolph County General Fund to be
distributed within 15 days of receipt as follows:
(1) Thirty-two percent shall be distributed in equal
shares to the recognized volunteer fire departments located in
the county and to the Randolph County Rescue Squad, with each
volunteer fire department receiving one share and the Randolph
County Rescue Squad receiving one share, to be used for fire
protection and emergency medical services in the county, as
provided in subsection (b).
(2) Twenty-four percent shall be used distributed to
the Randolph County Economic Development Authority for tourism
or economic development and tourism in the county.
(3) Twenty-four percent shall be retained in the
Page 1

(3) Twenty-four percent shall be retained in the
HB369 Enrolled
Randolph County General Fund to be used as are other county
funds.
(4) Ten percent shall be distributed to the Randolph
County Agricultural Center, Inc., to be used to pursue
educational opportunities related to and to promote all types
of agriculture in Randolph County and its surrounding area.
(5) Ten percent shall be distributed to the Randolph
County Animal Shelter to be used for small animal control on a
countywide basis.
(b)(1) The funds distributed to the recognized
volunteer fire departments shall be payable on a monthly basis
and shall be expended only for purposes of fire protection,
prevention, and fire safety education in order to encourage a
strong volunteer firefighter network in Randolph County. The
proceeds shall be distributed to volunteer fire departments in
the county meeting the minimum state standards as determined
by the Alabama Forestry Commission and recognized by the
Randolph County Volunteer Firefighters Association. None of
the proceeds shall be used for salaries or to pay members for
any performance of duties associated with the department. Any
member fire department that fails to meet the minimum
standards shall be denied its share of the funding. The
association shall give noncomplying member fire departments
proper notice of all deficiencies and a reasonable time period
to correct the deficiencies before any funds shall be denied.
(2) The share of the funds distributed to the Randolph
County Rescue Squad shall be payable on a monthly basis and
shall be expended only for the delivery of emergency
Page 2

shall be expended only for the delivery of emergency
HB369 Enrolled
services."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
HB369 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 10-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 19-Feb-26 Passed



Page 4